apertium-eo-en.en.dix
<pardef n="len/d__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ding</l>                <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>t</l>                   <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>t</l>                   <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ds</l>                  <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="zig-zag__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="slid/e__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>e</l>                   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>es</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="good/y__n">
<e>                           <p><l>ies</l>                 <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ie</l>                  <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>y</l>                   <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="child__n">
<e>                           <p><l>ren</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="beg/et__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>etting</l>              <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ot</l>                  <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>otten</l>               <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>et</l>                  <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ets</l>                 <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="armo/ured__adj">
<e>                           <p><l>red</l>                 <r>ured<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="w/in__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>inning</l>              <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>on</l>                  <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>on</l>                  <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>in</l>                  <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ins</l>                 <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="or__cnjcoo">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/ie__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ying</l>                <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ay</l>                  <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ied</l>                 <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ain</l>                 <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ied</l>                 <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ie</l>                  <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ies</l>                 <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="convey/er__n">
<e>                           <p><l>ors</l>                 <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>or</l>                  <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ascend/ancy__n">
<e r="LR">                           <p><l>encies</l>              <r>ancy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                           <p><l>ency</l>                <r>ancy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ancies</l>              <r>ancy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ancy</l>                <r>ancy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bus__n">
<e>                           <p><l>es</l>                  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ses</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="jewel/ler__n">
<e>                           <p><l>ers</l>                 <r>ler<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>er</l>                  <r>ler<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="phon/ey__adj">
<e>                           <p><l>ey</l>                  <r>ey<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>y</l>                   <r>ey<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="prov/e__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>en</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>en</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>e</l>                   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>es</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bid__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ding</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="belly-flop__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ped</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mo/uldy__adj">
<e>                           <p><l>ldy</l>                 <r>uldy<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="armoured">             <i>armo</i><par n="armo/ured__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ascendancy">           <i>ascend</i><par n="ascend/ancy__n"/></e>
<e lm="jeweller">             <i>jewel</i><par n="jewel/ler__n"/></e>
<e lm="mouldy">               <i>mo</i><par n="mo/uldy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="phoney">               <i>phon</i><par n="phon/ey__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pre-empt">             <i>pre-empt</i><par n="zig-zag__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="re-enact">             <i>re-enact</i><par n="zig-zag__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="re-establish">         <i>re-establish</i><par n="zig-zag__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="second-guess">         <i>second-guess</i><par n="zig-zag__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slide">                <i>slid</i><par n="slid/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zig-zag">              <i>zig-zag</i><par n="zig-zag__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prove">                <i>prov</i><par n="prov/e__vblex"/></e>
